Louisiana, session 2026, HB601.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 8-A of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 33:3850.1 through 3850.8, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 8-A. WATER AND WASTEWATER AFFORDABILITY AND RATE
PAYER PROTECTION ACT
§3850.1. Water and Wastewater Affordability and Rate Payer Protection Act; short
title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Water and Wastewater
Affordability and Ratepayer Protection Act".
§3850.2. Legislative findings; public health determination
A. The legislature finds that access to potable water and sanitary wastewater
services is indispensable to the protection of public health, sanitation, fire protection,
and the general welfare of the people of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1228 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 601
B. The legislature further finds that in certain municipalities with elevated
poverty rates or depressed median household income, residential water and
wastewater rates may impose a disproportionate financial burden, increasing the risk
of service disconnection, unsafe living conditions, and adverse public health
outcomes.
C. The legislature declares that the establishment of an affordability standard
for essential residential water and wastewater usage in qualifying municipalities
constitutes a valid exercise of the state's police powers for the protection of public
health and welfare.
D. This Chapter applies only to essential residential usage in economically
distressed municipalities and is not intended to impair municipal solvency,
contractual bond obligations, or regulatory compliance.
§3850.3. Definitions
As used in this Chapter , the following words shall have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Section:
(1) "Municipal utility system" means any water, sewer, or combined utility
owned or operated by a municipality or political subdivision providing residential
service.
(2) "Qualifying municipality" means a municipality that has either of the
following:
(a) A poverty rate exceeding thirty percent as determined by the most recent
United States Census Bureau data.
(b) A median household income less than fifty percent of the statewide
median household income as determined by the most recent American Community
Survey five-year estimate.
(3) "Essential residential utility usage" means both of the following:
(a) Up to four thousand gallons of potable water per monthly billing cycle.
(b) The corresponding wastewater volume reasonably attributable to such
water usage.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1228 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 601
(4) "Median household income" or "MHI" means the most recent American
Community Survey five-year estimate.
(5) "Total monthly essential utility charge" means the combined base rate
and volumetric charge for essential residential water and wastewater usage, exclusive
of penalties, late fees, reconnection fees, service deposits, or charges unrelated to
essential usage.
§3850.4. Affordability standard for essential residential water and wastewater
A. In any qualifying municipality, the total monthly essential utility charge
imposed upon a residential customer shall not exceed four and one-half percent of
the monthly equivalent of the municipality's median household income.
B. The affordability limitation established in this Section:
(1) Applies solely to essential residential utility usage.
(2) Does not restrict rates for consumption exceeding essential usage.
(3) Does not prohibit tiered or conservation-based rate structures.
C. A municipal utility system may petition the Louisiana Department of
Health for temporary compliance relief upon demonstrating by clear financial
documentation that immediate compliance would do any of the following:
(1) Cause a material impairment of outstanding bond obligations.
(2) Cause a violation of state or federal environmental regulations.
(3) Create a substantial and demonstrable risk of insolvency.
D. Any relief granted shall be temporary and narrowly tailored to restore
compliance within a reasonable time.
§3850.5. Meter accuracy and post-increase consumer protections
A. Following any residential rate increase exceeding ten percent within a
twelve-month period, a municipal utility system shall:
(1) Provide written notice of the rate increase and customer rights.
(2) Offer meter accuracy testing at no cost upon request.
(3) Publicly disclose the methodology used to calculate rate adjustments.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1228 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 601
B. If a meter is determined to be inaccurate beyond accepted industry
standards, the system shall:
(1) Recalibrate or replace the meter.
(2) Issue billing corrections retroactive for up to six months.
§3850.6. Advisory ratepayer review process
A. Each qualifying municipality shall establish an administrative process for
review of affordability compliance and billing disputes.
B. Any advisory review panel created pursuant to this Section shall issue
nonbinding recommendations.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create:
(1) A new cause of action.
(2) A private right of action for damages.
(3) Liability against the state or a political subdivision beyond existing law.
§3850.7. Construction; constitutional preservation
A. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to:
(1) Expand or diminish the jurisdiction of the Louisiana Public Service
Commission.
(2) Authorize state management or takeover of municipal utility systems.
(3) Impair the obligations of contracts, including bonded indebtedness, in
violation of Article I, Section 23 of the Constitution of Louisiana or Article I, Section
10 of the Constitution of the United States.
(4) Constitute a regulatory taking under Article I, Section 4 of the
Constitution of Louisiana or the Fifth Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States.
B. This Chapter shall be interpreted:
(1) As a public health and welfare measure under the police powers of the
state.
(2) In a manner that preserves municipal fiscal stability.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1228 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 601
(3) In favor of constitutionality if reasonably susceptible to such
construction.
C. If any provision or application of this Chapter is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications which can be given effect
without the invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are
severable.
§3850.8. Applicability
This Chapter shall apply only to municipal utility systems operating within
qualifying municipalities as defined in R.S. 33:3850.3.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.